Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-2706
Tractor model; failure to meet specifications; retesting permitted; effect on sale of other models; permit specify model.

The failure of any tractor model to meet the specifications and representations made by the applicant shall not prevent the applicant from placing on the market other tractor models that do comply with the permit requirements of sections 2-2701 to 2-2711. Any tractor model that fails in the official test to meet the applicant's own specifications and representations may be retested upon submission of a new test application and the fee specified in section 2-2705. Each and every permit issued under sections 2-2701 to 2-2711 shall specify the model or models included in such permit to sell.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 41, p. 1396;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-341;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 6, p. 1488;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 125.
July 1, 2026